South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S619.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Priority of distribution SECTION 1.    Section 38-27-610(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) Class 2. Claims under policies, including claims of federal, state, and local governments, for losses incurred, loss claims, including third party claims, and claims of a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association. Claims under life insurance, annuity policies, and funding agreements whether for death proceeds, annuity proceeds, or investment values, must be treated as loss claims. That portion of a loss, indemnification for which is provided by other benefits or advantages recovered by the claimant, must not be included in this class, other than benefits or advantages recovered or recoverable in discharge of familial obligations of support or by way of succession at death, or as proceeds of life insurance or as gratuities. No payment by an employer to his employee may be treated as a gratuity. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________